apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="বাঘ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nom" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nom" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোকে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="obj" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="gen" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="gen" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="gen" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="gen" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Postpositions -->

    <pardef n="এর__post">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="post" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="কী__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="int" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="sp" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="পরস্পর__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="rec" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="pl" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="যা/রা__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /><s n="rel" /><s n="aa" /><s n="mf" /><s
              n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দেরকে</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /><s n="rel" /><s n="aa" /><s n="mf" /><s
              n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /><s n="rel" /><s n="aa" /><s n="mf" /><s
              n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="যেটা__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="rel" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="কিসের__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="int" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="sp" />
            <s n="gen" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="নিজে/রা__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn" /><s n="ref" /><s n="mf" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দেরকে</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn" /><s n="ref" /><s n="mf" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn" /><s n="ref" /><s n="mf" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="আপনা আপনি__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="rec" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="sp" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="অন্য/রা__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn" /><s n="p3" /><s n="mf" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r>রা<s n="prn" /><s n="p3" /><s n="mf" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="সকল__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r>
            <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="gen" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r>
            <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="obj" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="বাঘ">
      <i>বাঘ</i>
      <par n="বাঘ__n_m" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সিংহ">
      <i>সিংহ</i>
      <par n="বাঘ__n_m" />
    </e>
    <e lm="থেকে">
      <i>থেকে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পরে">
      <i>পরে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বিরুদ্ধে">
      <i>বিরুদ্ধে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আগে">
      <i>আগে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পাশে">
      <i>পাশে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ব্যতীত">
      <i>ব্যতীত</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মধ্যে">
      <i>মধ্যে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বাদে">
      <i>বাদে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="এর">
      <i>এর</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বাইরে">
      <i>বাইরে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বাইরে">
      <i>বাইরে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বরং">
      <i>বরং</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অতঃপর">
      <i>অতঃপর</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="চেয়ে">
      <i>চেয়ে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="প্রতি">
      <i>প্রতি</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="দিকে">
      <i>দিকে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="দিকে">
      <i>দিকে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="তলদেশে">
      <i>তলদেশে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="উপর">
      <i>উপর</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="উচ্চতর অংশ">
      <i>উচ্চতর<b />অংশ</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মধ্যে">
      <i>মধ্যে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="উপরে">
      <i>উপরে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ছাড়া">
      <i>ছাড়া</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অনুযায়ী">
      <i>অনুযায়ী</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ছাড়াও">
      <i>ছাড়াও</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="জন্যই">
      <i>জন্যই</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মধ্যেই">
      <i>মধ্যেই</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সত্ত্বেও">
      <i>সত্ত্বেও</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মানে">
      <i>মানে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="দ্বারা">
      <i>দ্বারা</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ছাড়াই">
      <i>ছাড়াই</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সঙ্গে">
      <i>সঙ্গে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সাথে">
      <i>সাথে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="জন্য">
      <i>জন্য</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মতো">
      <i>মতো</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অবধি">
      <i>অবধি</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বনাম">
      <i>বনাম</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মতোই">
      <i>মতোই</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="তাই">
      <i>তাই</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বিনা">
      <i>বিনা</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="জন্যও">
      <i>জন্যও</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সঙ্গেই">
      <i>সঙ্গেই</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মধ্যেও">
      <i>মধ্যেও</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বরাবর">
      <i>বরাবর</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বাবদ">
      <i>বাবদ</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কর্তৃক">
      <i>কর্তৃক</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সঙ্গেও">
      <i>সঙ্গেও</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="শুধুই">
      <i>শুধুই</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="চাইতে">
      <i>চাইতে</i>
      <par n="এর__post" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কিসের">
      <i>কিসের</i>
      <par n="কিসের__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="নিজে নিজে">
      <i>নিজে<b />নিজে</i>
      <par n="আপনা আপনি__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="যেটা">
      <i>যেটা</i>
      <par n="যেটা__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সকল">
      <i>সকল</i>
      <par n="সকল__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পরস্পর">
      <i>পরস্পর</i>
      <par n="পরস্পর__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="নিজেরা">
      <i>নিজে</i>
      <par n="নিজে/রা__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আপনা আপনি">
      <i>আপনা<b />আপনি</i>
      <par n="আপনা আপনি__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অন্যরা">
      <i>অন্য</i>
      <par n="অন্য/রা__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কী">
      <i>কী</i>
      <par n="কী__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="যারা">
      <i>যা</i>
      <par n="যা/রা__prn" />
    </e>
